Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 10. GENERAL GOVERNMENT

SUBTITLE C. STATE ACCOUNTING, FISCAL MANAGEMENT, AND PRODUCTIVITY

CHAPTER 2109. VOLUNTEERS

Sec. 2109.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Governmental entity" means a state agency or any other governmental entity supported in whole or in part by funds received from the state.

(2) "Human services" means providing for basic human mental or physical needs.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 2109.002. USE OF VOLUNTEERS FOR HUMAN SERVICES. A governmental entity that provides human services shall use volunteers, if feasible, to assist in providing human services of a high quality.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 2109.003. DEVELOPMENT OF PROGRAMS. (a) Each governmental entity shall develop a volunteer program.

(b) In developing the program, the governmental entity shall consider volunteers a resource that requires advance planning and preparation for effective use.

(c) The governmental entity shall include, if practicable, volunteers in addition to paid staff in planning the implementation of the program.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 2109.004. PROGRAM REQUIREMENTS AND GUIDELINES. (a) A volunteer program must include:

(1) an effective training program for paid staff and prospective volunteers;

(2) the use of paid staff to plan and implement the volunteer program;

(3) an evaluation mechanism to assess:

(A) the performance of the volunteers;

(B) the cooperation of paid staff with the volunteers; and

(C) the volunteer program; and

(4) follow-up studies to ensure the effectiveness of the volunteer program.

(b) A volunteer program may:

(1) establish a program to reimburse volunteers for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of volunteer services;

(2) establish an insurance program to protect volunteers in the performance of volunteer services;

(3) cooperate with private organizations that provide services similar to those provided by the governmental entity; and

(4) purchase engraved certificates, plaques, pins, or awards of a similar nature, with a value that does not exceed $75 for each volunteer, to recognize special achievement and outstanding services of volunteers.

(c) This section applies to a volunteer program of a governmental entity, regardless of whether the governmental entity provides human services.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 2109.005. MERIT PAY; PERFORMANCE EVALUATIONS. A governmental entity that has a volunteer program shall consider the use of volunteers in determining merit pay increases and performance evaluations.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 2109.006. STATE BUDGET RECOMMENDATIONS. During the preparation of budget recommendations, the Legislative Budget Board shall review the use of funds requested for volunteer programs.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.